Louisiana, session 2026, HB274.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3047.2(A)(8)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§3047.2. Initial eligibility
A. To be eligible for the award, an applicant shall meet the following
requirements:
* * *
(8)
* * *
(b) Have no conviction for any crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B);
however, a conviction for any crime also listed in R.S. 13:5401(B)(1)(f) shall not
make an otherwise qualified applicant ineligible unless the conviction is for one of
the following:
(i) Battery of a police officer (R.S. 14:34.2).
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-492 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 274
(ii) Aggravated assault with a firearm (R.S. 14:37.4).
(iii) Simple kidnapping (R.S. 14:45).
* * *